Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.100

Director's powers and duties.

The director of financial management shall:

(1) Supervise and administer the activities of the office of financial management.

(2) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law with respect to the administration of the state budget and accounting system.

(3) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters affecting program management and planning.

(4) Make efficiency surveys of all state departments and institutions, and the administrative and business methods pursued therein, examine into the physical needs and industrial activities thereof, and make confidential reports to the governor, recommending necessary betterments, repairs, and the installation of improved and more economical administrative methods, and advising such action as will result in a greater measure of self-support and remedies for inefficient functioning.

The director may enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter; he or she may act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any multi-governmental agency program relative to the purposes of this chapter; and he or she may accept gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other funds.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5119; 1979 c 151 s 114; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 8.]